Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

Chapter 8026A, consisting of Secs. 8026A.0101 to 8026A.0106, was added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 794 (H.B. 5418), Sec. 1.

For another Chapter 8026A, consisting of Secs. 8026A.0101 to 8026A.0402, added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 651 (H.B. 5411), Sec. 1, see Sec. 8026A.0101 et seq., post.

CHAPTER 8026A. KARIS MUNICIPAL MANAGEMENT DISTRICT OF TARRANT COUNTY

Sec. 8026A.0101. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

(3) "Director" means a board member.

(4) "District" means the Karis Municipal Management District of Tarrant County.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 794 (H.B. 5418), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 8026A.0102. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal management district created by order of the commission under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution and operating under Chapter 375, Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 794 (H.B. 5418), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 8026A.0103. GOVERNING BODY; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Except as provided by Section 8026A.0104, directors serve staggered four-year terms.

(c) The initial directors were appointed with terms by the commission to serve until their successors are elected or have been appointed in accordance with applicable law.

(d) Subsequent directors shall be elected in the manner provided by Subchapter D, Chapter 49, Water Code.

(e) Section 375.064, Local Government Code, does not apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 794 (H.B. 5418), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 8026A.0104. DIRECTORS. (a) The current terms of directors initially appointed by the commission to serve two-year terms shall expire on the date of the general May election in 2024, and the current terms of directors initially appointed by the commission to serve four-year terms shall expire on the date of the general May election in 2026.

(b) If successor directors have not been elected and the terms of the initial directors have expired, successor directors shall be appointed or reappointed as provided by Subsection (c) to serve terms that expire on the earlier of:

(1) the date successor directors are elected; or

(2) the fourth anniversary of the date of the appointment or reappointment.

(c) If Subsection (b) applies, the owner or owners of a majority of the assessed value of the real property in the district may submit a petition to the commission requesting that the commission appoint as successor directors the five persons named in the petition. The commission shall appoint as successor directors the five persons named in the petition.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 794 (H.B. 5418), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 8026A.0105. COMPENSATION. A director is entitled to receive fees of office and reimbursement for actual expenses as provided by Section 49.060, Water Code. Sections 375.069 and 375.070, Local Government Code, do not apply to the board.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 794 (H.B. 5418), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 8026A.0106. ASSESSMENT. The board by resolution may impose and collect an assessment for any purpose authorized by law in all or any part of the district. Section 375.161, Local Government Code, does not apply to an assessment imposed by the district.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 794 (H.B. 5418), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.